Tennessee, session 114, HB0922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-2108(b), is amended by
deleting "three (3) business days" and substituting "five (5) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0922
002685
- 1 -